Utah statutes.
34A-6-103.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Administrator" means the director of the Division of Occupational Safety
and Health.
(2)  "Amendment" means such modification or change in a code, standard, rule,
or order intended for universal or general application.
(3)  "Commission" means the Labor Commission.
(4)  "Council" means the Utah Occupational Safety and Health Advisory Council.
(5)  "Division" means the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.
(6)  "Employee" includes any person suffered or permitted to work by an
employer.
(7)  "Employer" means:
(a)  the state;
(b)  each county, city, town, and school district in the state; and
(c)  every person, firm, and private corporation, including public utilities,
having one or more workers or operatives regularly employed in the same
business, or in or about the same establishment, under any contract of hire.
(8)  "Hearing" means a proceeding conducted by the commission.
(9)  "Imminent danger" means a danger exists which reasonably could be
expected to cause an occupational disease, death, or serious physical harm
immediately, or before the danger could be eliminated through enforcement
procedures under this chapter.
(10)  "National consensus standard" means any occupational safety and health
standard or modification:
(a)  adopted by a nationally recognized standards-producing organization under
procedures where it can be determined by the administrator and division that
persons interested and affected by the standard have reached substantial
agreement on its adoption;
(b)  formulated in a manner which affords an opportunity for diverse views to
be considered; and
(c)  designated as such a standard by the Secretary of the United States
Department of Labor.
(11)  "Person" means the general public, one or more individuals,
partnerships, associations, corporations, legal representatives, trustees,
receivers, and the state and its political subdivisions.
(12)  "Publish" means publication in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(13)  "Secretary" means the Secretary of the United States Department of
Labor.
(14)  "Standard" means an occupational health and safety standard or group of
standards which requires conditions, or the adoption or use of one or more
practices, means, methods, operations, or processes, reasonably necessary to
provide safety and healthful employment and places of employment.
(15)  "Variance" means a special, limited modification or change in the code
or standard applicable to the particular establishment of the employer or
person petitioning for the modification or change.
(16)  "Workplace" means any place of employment.
